Nebraska, session 109, LB936.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB936 LB936
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 38-1915, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1915 (1)(a) (1) A person licensed by the department, with the
recommendation of the board, as a medical radiographer may practice
medical radiography on any part of the human anatomy for interpretation
by, and under the direction of, a licensed practitioner, including
computed tomography but excluding interpretative fluoroscopic procedures,
and may use fluoroscopy in collaboration conjunction with a certified
registered nurse anesthetist as authorized in section 38-711.
(b) A medical radiographer may also utilize fluoroscopy under the
direction of, or in collaboration with, a nurse practitioner pursuant to
section 38-2315.
(2) An applicant for a license as a medical radiographer shall:
(a) Complete an educational program in radiography approved by the
board pursuant to subsection (1) of section 38-1918;
(b) Complete an application in accordance with the Uniform
Credentialing Act; and
(c) Successfully complete an examination approved by the board.
(3) Presentation of proof of registration in radiography with the
American Registry of Radiologic Technologists is proof of meeting the
requirements of subdivisions (2)(a) and (c) of this section.
Sec. 2. Section 38-2315, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2315 (1) A nurse practitioner may provide health care services
within specialty areas. A nurse practitioner shall function by
establishing collaborative, consultative, and referral networks as
appropriate with other health care professionals. Patients who require
care beyond the scope of practice of a nurse practitioner shall be
referred to an appropriate health care provider.
(2) Nurse practitioner practice means health promotion, health
supervision, illness prevention and diagnosis, treatment, and management
-2-

LB936 LB936
2026 2026
of common health problems and acute and chronic conditions, including:
(a) Assessing patients, ordering diagnostic tests and therapeutic
treatments, synthesizing and analyzing data, and applying advanced
nursing principles;
(b) Dispensing, incident to practice only, sample medications which
are provided by the manufacturer and are provided at no charge to the
patient; and
(c) Prescribing therapeutic measures and medications relating to
health conditions within the scope of practice.
(3) A nurse practitioner who has proof of a current certification
from an approved certification program in a psychiatric or mental health
specialty may manage the care of patients committed under the Nebraska
Mental Health Commitment Act. Patients who require care beyond the scope
of practice of a nurse practitioner, who has proof of a current
certification from an approved certification program in a psychiatric or
mental health specialty, shall be referred to an appropriate health care
provider.
(4) A nurse practitioner may pronounce death and may complete and
sign death certificates and any other forms if such acts are within the
scope of practice of the nurse practitioner and are not otherwise
prohibited by law.
(5) A nurse practitioner may perform and utilize fluoroscopy for
procedural guidance and for the performance of authorized duties upon the
nurse practitioner's successful completion of appropriate education and
training as approved jointly by the department and the board. Such
education and training shall be in accordance with rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated pursuant to section 71-3508. A nurse practitioner
may also direct fluoroscopy in collaboration with a licensed medical
radiographer.
Sec. 3. Original sections 38-1915 and 38-2315, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-